Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 3 Uniform Act for Out-of-State Parolee Supervision

42-9-70 and 42-9-71.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 405, §§ 1, 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 42; repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 240, § 2, effective July 1, 2008.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 240, § 2 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2008.